Hawaii, session 2026, SB3039.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that carrying a lethal firearm as the only means of defense often increases danger to the public. Data demonstrates that lethal firearms intended to be wielded by a victim to defend themselves often end up being used against the victim or being used to kill another person, instead of being used successfully for self-defense.  Other times, individuals using firearms in self-defense injure or kill innocent bystanders. The legislature believes that carrying a lethal firearm for self-defense can often escalate a dangerous situation, rather than de-escalate it, and that requiring individuals carrying firearms to also carry non-lethal options for self-defense will improve safety for the carrier, the public, and law enforcement. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to: (1)  Prohibit persons with a license to carry a firearm from carrying a firearm on the licensee's person without also carrying an electric gun on the licensee's person; and (2)  Require a person's license to carry a firearm be revoked if the licensee carries a firearm without also carrying an electric gun. SECTION 2. Chapter 134, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§134-    Carrying a firearm; requirement to carry an electric gun.  (a)  A person with a license issued under section 134-9 shall not carry a firearm on the licensee's person within the State without also carrying an electric gun on the licensee's person. (b) A person's license issued under section 134-9 shall be subject to revocation under section 134-13 if the licensee violates subsection (a). (c) For the purposes of this section, "electric gun" has the same meaning as defined in section 134-81." SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________